Alaska, session 34, SB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. ALASKA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AND EXPORT AUTHORITY. 05 The sum of $50,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska Industrial 06 Development and Export Authority for the reimbursement of the Alaska Liquified Natural 07 Gas pipeline project front-end engineering and design expenditures for the fiscal years ending 08 June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 09 * Sec. 2. SUPPLEMENTAL FUND CAPITALIZATION. The sum of $15,000,000 is 10 appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 11 * Sec. 3. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The unexpended balance of the appropriation 12 made in sec. 1 of this Act lapses into the general fund on June 30, 2027. 13 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 2 of this Act is for the capitalization of a fund and 14 does not lapse. 01 * Sec. 4. RETROACTIVITY. If this Act takes effect after June 30, 2025, this Act is 02 retroactive to July 1, 2024. 03 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.